New York, session 2025-2026, S10395.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 15-1501 of the environmental 2 conservation law, as added by chapter 401 of the laws of 2011, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 8. The department shall establish a water conservation and efficiency 5 program with the goals of (a) ensuring improvement of the waters and 6 water dependent natural resources, (b) protecting and restoring the 7 hydrologic and ecosystem integrity of watersheds throughout the state, 8 (c) retaining the quantity of surface water and groundwater in the 9 state, (d) ensuring sustainable use of state waters, and (e) promoting 10 the efficiency of use and reducing losses and waste of water. For 11 communities that rely on groundwater as their water supply, and are at 12 risk from saltwater intrusion, the department shall develop and imple- 13 ment a public education program to explain to water users in all sectors 14 the necessity of water use reduction. Such program shall explain the 15 limitations and describe effective actions to ensure the sustainability 16 of the water supply. 17 § 2. Paragraph g of subdivision 2 of section 15-1503 of the environ- 18 mental conservation law, as added by chapter 401 of the laws of 2011, is 19 amended to read as follows: 20 g. the proposed water withdrawal will be implemented in a manner that 21 incorporates environmentally sound and economically feasible water 22 conservation measures, including mandating use of smart controllers for 23 automatic irrigation systems; and 24 § 3. Subdivision 3 of section 15-1503 of the environmental conserva- 25 tion law, as amended by chapter 401 of the laws of 2011, is amended to 26 read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15866-02-6 S. 10395 2 1 3. In order to assist the development of local water conservation 2 programs for public water supply systems, the department shall continue 3 to publish and distribute a water conservation manual that includes 4 beneficial near term and long range water conservation procedures which 5 reflect local water resource needs and conditions. Such water conserva- 6 tion manual shall be revised and updated every five years. The first 7 update shall be published in two thousand twenty-eight and then every 8 five years thereafter. Such manual shall include examples of: 9 a. methods of identifying and determining the cost effectiveness of 10 distribution system rehabilitation to correct sources of lost water; 11 b. measures which encourage proper maintenance and water conservation; 12 c. a public information program to promote water conservation, includ- 13 ing industrial and commercial recycling and reuse; 14 d. household conservation measures; [and] 15 e. contingency measures for limiting water use during seasonal or 16 drought shortages[.], and local emergencies or disasters; 17 f. best management practices for specific sectors of the water-using 18 community designed to increase engagement and specific actions to 19 increase water conservation; 20 g. recommended changes to water irrigation practices; and 21 h. rebate programs to offset the cost of smart controllers for auto- 22 matic irrigation systems required by paragraph g of subdivision two of 23 this section. 24 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.